Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5304.02
Public water system; notice; requirements.

(1) The director may require a public water system to give notice to the persons served by the system and to the department whenever the system:

(a) Is not in compliance with an applicable maximum contaminant level or treatment technique requirement of or a testing procedure prescribed by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act;

(b) Fails to perform monitoring, testing, analyzing, or sampling as required;

(c) Is subject to a variance or exemption; or

(d) Is not in compliance with the requirements prescribed by a variance or exemption.

(2) The director may require a public water system to give notice to the persons served by the public water system of potential sources of contamination as identified by the director under subsection (2) of section 71-5302, of possible health effects of such contamination, and of possible mitigation measures.

(3) The director shall by rule and regulation prescribe the form and manner for giving such notice.

Laws 1988, LB 383, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 715;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 34;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 612.